Hawaii, session 2026, SB590.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 184-3.4, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b) The department shall expend the moneys from the state parks special fund for the following purposes: (1)  Permanent and temporary staff positions; (2)  Planning and development of state parks programs, including the aina hoomalu state parks program; (3)  Construction, repairs, replacement, additions, and extensions of state parks facilities; (4)  Operation and maintenance costs of state parks and state parks programs; [and] (5)  Any departmental program aimed at environmental protection; and [(5)] (6)  Administrative costs of the division of state parks." SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________